hr-HR: Vrsta hardvera za elektrode: Kopča s oprugom; Robusna kopča; Karabiner; Lanac s rukohvatom; Upletena petlja; Petlja; Bez kopče; Panik kopča; Kopča za brzo otpuštanje; Okretna kopča; Kopča s okidačem; Ostalo
nl: Lijn hardwaretype: Schuifmusketonhaak; Stierenhaak; Karabijnhaak; Hengstenketting; Oogsplits; Lus; Geen; Paniekhaak; Snelsluiting; Draaibare karabijnhaak; Teugelhaak; Overig
es: Tipo de herraje de la correa: Gancho de presión; Gancho reforzado; Mosquetón; Ronzal de cadena; Empalme de ojo; Bucle; Ninguno; Mosquetón antipánico; Hebilla de liberación rápida; Gancho giratorio; Gancho con gatillo; Otro
it: Tipo di hardware del guinzaglio: Moschettone a levetta; Moschettone a toro; Moschettone; Catena con moschettone; Impiombatura ad occhiello; Anello; Nessuno; Moschettone antipanico; Fibbia a sgancio rapido; Moschettone girevole; Moschettone a grilletto; Altro
zh-TW: 牽引繩五金類型: 彈簧鉤; 重型彈簧鉤; 登山扣; 鏈條牽繩; 圈眼編接; 圈環; 無; 快速脫扣; 快拆扣; 旋轉彈簧扣; 扳機扣; 其他
pl: Typ osprzętu linki prowadzącej: Karabińczyk suwakowy; Karabińczyk byczy (bull snap); Karabińczyk; Krótki łańcuch (shank); Splot oczkowy; Pętla; Brak; Karabińczyk bezpieczeństwa (panic snap); Klamra szybkiego rozpinania; Karabińczyk obrotowy; Karabińczyk nożycowy (trigger snap); Inne
bg-BG: Тип оловен обков: Карабинка с резе; Карабинка за бикове; Карабинер; Верижка; Заплетен усукан край; Халка; Няма; Паник карабинка; Катарама за бързо освобождаване; Въртяща се карабинка; Карабинка със спусък; Друг
ru: Тип фурнитуры поводка: Карабин-защелка; Карабин для крупного скота; Карабин; Цепной поводок; Огон; Петля; Нет; Паник-карабин; Быстроразъемная пряжка; Карабин с вертлюгом; Карабин с курком; Другое
ja: リードハードウェアタイプ: ボルトスナップ; ブルスナップ; カラビナ; チェーンシャンク; アイスプライス; ループ; なし; パニックスナップ; クイックリリースバックル; スイベルスナップ; トリガースナップ; その他
lt-LT: Pavadėlio furnitūros tipas: Slankiojamasis karabinas; Karabinas gyvuliams; Karabinas; Grandinė; Įpinta kilpa; Kilpa; Nėra; Apsauginis karabinas; Greito atjungimo sagtis; Sukamasis karabinas; Svirtinis karabinas; Kita
fi: Metalliosien tyyppi: Pulttilukko; Vahva lukko; Karbiinihaka; Oriketju; Silmukkapunos; Lenkki; Ei mitään; Paniikkilukko; Pikalukko; Leikarilukko; Liipaisinlukko; Muu
zh-CN: 牵引绳末端五金类型: 滑栓弹簧扣; 牛头扣; 登山扣; 牵马链; 索眼插接; 绳环; 无; 防恐慌扣; 快拆扣; 旋转弹簧扣; 扳机扣; 其他
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์ยึดสายจูง: สลักสแน็ป; สแน็ปหัวหนา; คาราไบเนอร์; โซ่จูง; ห่วงปลายเชือก; ห่วง; ไม่มี; สแน็ปปลดเร็ว; ตัวล็อกปลดเร็ว; สแน็ปแบบหมุน; สแน็ปแบบไกปืน; อื่นๆ
tr: Tasma bağlantı donanımı türü: Sürgülü kanca; Boğa kancası; Karabina; Zincir sap; Göz dikişi; İlmek; Yok; Panik kancası; Hızlı açılan toka; Döner kanca; Tetikli kanca; Diğer
vi: Loại phần cứng dây dẫn: Móc khóa trượt; Móc bò; Móc khóa carabiner; Xích; Khuyết dây; Vòng; Không có; Khóa tháo nhanh; Khóa nhả nhanh; Móc khóa xoay; Móc cò; Khác
sv: Typ av kopplingshårdvara: Pistolhake; Bull snap; Karbinhake; Kedja; Ögonsplits; Ögla; Ingen; Panikhake; Snabbspänne; Svivelhake; Pistolhake; Övrigt
hu: Vezetőszár hardvertípusa: Tolózáras karabiner; Bikakötő karabiner; Karabiner; Láncos szár; Hurokkötés; Hurok; Nincs; Pánikkarabiner; Gyorskioldó csat; Forgókarabiner; Ollós karabiner; Egyéb
da: Type af snorhardware: Bolthage; Tyrehage; Karabinhage; Kædeskaft; Øjesplejsning; Løkke; Ingen; Panikhage; Quick release-spænde; Svirvelhage; Fjederhage; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul de feronerie pentru lesă (plumb): Carabină cu închizător; Carabină Bull snap; Carabinieră; Lanț de forță; Ochi împletit; Buclă; Fără; Carabină antipanică; Cataramă cu eliberare rapidă; Carabină rotativă; Carabină cu trăgaci; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta strojne opreme povodca: Karabin z zatičem; Karabin z drsnim zapahom; Karabin; Veriga; Vpleteno uho; Zanka; Brez; Varnostni karabin; Zaponka za hitro odpenjanje; Vrtljivi karabin; Karabin s sprožilcem; Drugo
cs: Typ kování vodítka: Zacvakávací karabina; Karabina s kroužkem (Bull snap); Karabina; Řetízek; Záplet s okem; Smyčka; Žádné; Panik karabina; Rychloupínací spona; Otočná karabina; Nůžková karabina; Jiné
el: Τύπος υλικού εξοπλισμού οδηγού: Γάντζος με ελατήριο; Γάντζος bull snap; Καραμπίνερ; Αλυσίδα συγκράτησης; Γάσα; Θηλιά; Κανένα; Γάντζος πανικού; Πόρπη ταχείας αποδέσμευσης; Περιστρεφόμενος γάντζος; Γάντζος με σκανδάλη; Άλλο
en: Lead hardware type: Bolt snap; Bull snap; Carabiner; Chain shank; Eye splice; Loop; None; Panic snap; Quick release buckle; Swivel snap; Trigger snap; Other
sk-SK: Typ hardvéru vodidla: Čapová karabína; Masívna karabína; Karabína; Retiazka; Zapletané oko; Slučka; Žiadne; Vypúšťacia karabína; Rýchloupínacia pracka; Otočná karabína; Karabína s kohútikom; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de equipamento da trela: Mosquetão com pino; Mosquetão para touros; Mosquetão; Haste de corrente; Falcaça com olhal; Laço; Nenhum; Mosquetão de pânico; Fivela de libertação rápida; Mosquetão giratório; Mosquetão com gatilho; Outro
ko: 리드 하드웨어 유형: 볼트 스냅; 불 스냅; 카라비너; 체인 섕크; 아이 스플라이스; 루프; 없음; 패닉 스냅; 퀵릴리스 버클; 스위블 스냅; 트리거 스냅; 기타
pt-BR: Guia tipo de ferragem: Mosquetão com gatilho; Mosquetão tipo bull snap; Mosquetão; Corrente de cabresto; Emenda com alça; Laço; Nenhum; Mosquetão de pânico; Fivela de liberação rápida; Mosquetão giratório; Mosquetão tipo gatilho; Outro
de: Typ der Leinenbefestigung: Bolzenkarabiner; Bull-Snap; Karabiner; Führkette; Augspleiß; Schlaufe; Keine; Panikhaken; Schnellverschluss-Schnalle; Drehkarabiner; Zangenkarabiner; Sonstige
nb: Type feste på kobbel: Boltkrok; Oksekrok; Karabinkrok; Kjettingleietau; Øyespleis; Løkke; Ingen; Panikk-krok; Hurtigspenne; Svivelkrok; Pistolkrok; Annet
fr: Type de pièce d’attache de la laisse: Mousqueton à pompe; Mousqueton pour taureau; Mousqueton; Longe à chaîne; Épissure à œil; Boucle; Aucun; Mousqueton de sécurité; Boucle à dégagement rapide; Mousqueton pivotant; Mousqueton à gâchette; Autre